Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.090

Local improvement district—Assessments—Bonds and warrants.

For the purpose of paying all or a portion of the cost of heating facilities, a municipality may form local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts, foreclose on, levy, and collect assessments, reassessments, and supplemental assessments; and issue local improvement district bonds and warrants in the manner provided by law for cities or towns.

[ 1983 c 216 s 9.]